apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="скільк/и-небудь__prn"><!-- ile bądź -->
  <e>       <p><l>и-небудь</l>  <r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох-небудь</l> <r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох-небудь</l> <r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом-небудь</l> <r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох-небудь</l> <r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ома-небудь</l><r>и-небудь<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="казна-скільк/и__prn"><!-- nie wiadomo ile ~ ilekolwiek -->
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>охсь</l>      <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>охсь</l>      <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>омсь</l>      <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>охсь</l>      <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>омась</l>     <r>и<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="хтось__prn"><!-- ktoś -->
  <e>       <p><l>хтось</l>     <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>когось</l>    <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>когось</l>    <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>комусь</l>    <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>комусь</l>    <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>кімсь</l>     <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кимось</l>    <r>хтось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ніхто__prn"><!-- nikt -->
  <e>       <p><l>ніхто</l>     <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нікого</l>    <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нікого</l>    <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нікому</l>    <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нікому</l>    <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>нікім</l>     <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ніким</l>     <r>ніхто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ніщо__prn"><!-- nic -->
  <e>       <p><l>ніщо</l>      <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нічого</l>    <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нічого</l>    <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нічому</l>    <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нічому</l>    <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>нічім</l>     <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нічим</l>     <r>ніщо<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="як/ий__prn"><!-- jaki -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ий<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="котр/ий__det"><!-- który -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ий<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="щось__prn"><!-- coś -->
  <e>       <p><l>щось</l>      <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чогось</l>    <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чомусь</l>    <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>щось</l>      <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чимось</l>    <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>чимсь</l>     <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чомусь</l>    <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e><!--чімсь-->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>чімсь</l>     <r>щось<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e><!--чімсь-->
</pardef>



<!--end of pronouns-->

<pardef n="BASE__мій">
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оя</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оє</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ої</l>        <r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєї</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїх</l>       <r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєму</l>      <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїй</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєму</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїм</l>       <r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оє</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їх</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїм</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєю</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїм</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїми</l>      <r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєму</l>      <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>оїй</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїй</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оєму</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>оїй</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оїх</l>       <r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="м/ій__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ій<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__мій"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="м/ій__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ій<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__мій"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="хтось">           <i></i><par n="хтось__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ніхто">           <i></i><par n="ніхто__prn"/></e>
<e lm="казна-скільки">   <i>казна-скільк</i><par n="казна-скільк/и__prn"/></e>
<e lm="котрий">          <i>котр</i><par n="як/ий__prn"/></e>
<e lm="свій">            <i>св</i><par n="м/ій__prn"/></e>
<e lm="твій">            <i>тв</i><par n="м/ій__prn"/></e-->
<e lm="скільки" i="yes"> <i>скільк</i><par n="скільк/и__prn"/></e>
<e lm="скільки-небудь">  <i>скільк</i><par n="скільк/и-небудь__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ніщо">            <i></i><par n="ніщо__prn"/></e>
<e lm="щось">            <i></i><par n="щось__prn"/></e>
<e lm="котрий">          <i>котр</i><par n="котр/ий__det"/></e>
<e lm="мій">             <i>м</i><par n="м/ій__det"/></e>
<e lm="свій">            <i>св</i><par n="м/ій__det"/></e>
<e lm="твій">            <i>тв</i><par n="м/ій__det"/></e>
